public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
òfro/eJL
ƚanguir/eE
ƚanguo/eJL
akonsentir/eE
akonsento/eJL
aparteñir/eE
aparteño/eJL
arveñir/eE
arveño/eJL
asèrvo/eJL
aservir/eE
asteñir/eE
asteño/eJL
ateñir/eE
ateño/eJL
aveñir/eE
aveño/eJL
bensèrvo/eJL
benservir/eE
dòrmo/eJL
dementir/eE
demento/eJL
desaƚir/eE
desaƚo/eJL
desalir/eE
desalo/eJL
deskonveñir/eE
deskonveño/eJL
deteñir/eE
deteño/eJL
deveñir/eE
deveño/eJL
dexvèsto/eJL
dexveñir/eE
dexveño/eJL
dexvestir/eE
disentir/eE
disento/eJL
dormir/eE
ensir/eE
enso/eJL
envèsto/eJL
envestir/eE
esir/eE
eso/eJL
exèguo/eJL
exeguir/eE
indòrmo/eJL
indormir/eE
inkonteñir/eE
inkonteño/eJL
insèguo/eJL
inseguir/eE
inspesir/eE
inspeso/eJL
intarveñir/eE
intarveño/eJL
interveñir/eE
interveño/eJL
intrateñir/eE
intrateño/eJL
intraveñir/eE
intraveño/eJL
invèsto/eJL
investir/eE
ispesir/eE
ispeso/eJL
konsèguo/eJL
konseguir/eE
konsentir/eE
konsento/eJL
konteñir/eE
konteño/eJL
kontraveñir/eE
kontraveño/eJL
konveñir/eE
konveño/eJL
languir/eE
languo/eJL
mòro/eJL
malsentir/eE
malsento/eJL
manteñir/eE
manteño/eJL
mentir/eE
mento/eJL
morir/eE
ofrir/eE
oteñir/eE
oteño/eJL
parsèguo/eJL
parseguir/eE
parveñir/eE
parveño/eJL
pentir/eE
pento/eJL
persèguo/eJL
perseguir/eE
perveñir/eE
perveño/eJL
premòro/eJL
premorir/eE
prosèguo/eJL
proseguir/eE
reinvèsto/eJL
reinvestir/eE
resaƚir/eE
resaƚo/eJL
resalir/eE
resalo/eJL
resentir/eE
resento/eJL
resoveñir/eE
resoveño/eJL
reteñir/eE
reteño/eJL
revèsto/eJL
reveñir/eE
reveño/eJL
revestir/eE
riensir/eE
rienso/eJL
riesir/eE
rieso/eJL
rinveñir/eE
rinveño/eJL
sèguo/eJL
sèrvo/eJL
sòfro/eJL
saƚir/eE
saƚo/eJL
salir/eE
salo/eJL
seguir/eE
sentir/eE
sento/eJL
servir/eE
skonveñir/eE
skonveño/eJL
sofrir/eE
soraveñir/eE
soraveño/eJL
sosteñir/eE
sosteño/eJL
soveñir/eE
soveño/eJL
strasaƚir/eE
strasaƚo/eJL
strasalir/eE
strasalo/eJL
strasentir/eE
strasento/eJL
stravèsto/eJL
stravestir/eE
susèguo/eJL
suseguir/eE
teñir/eE
teño/eJL
trateñir/eE
trateño/eJL
travèsto/eJL
travestir/eE
vèsto/eJL
veñir/eE
veño/eJL
vestir/eE
xlanguir/eE
xlanguo/eJL
xvèsto/eJL
xvestir/eE
